Vermont, session 2025-2026, H601.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 30 V.S.A. § 202b is amended to read:
§ 202b. STATE COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY PLAN
* * *
(e) The Commissioner of Public Service (Commissioner) shall file an
annual report on progress in meeting the goals of the Plan. The report shall
address each of the following sectors of energy consumption in the State:
electricity, nonelectric fuels for thermal purposes, and transportation. In
preparing the report, the Commissioner shall consult with the Secretaries of
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 2 of 24
Administration, of Agriculture, Food and Markets, of Natural Resources, and
of Transportation and the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.
* * *
(3) For each sector, the report shall provide:
(A) In millions of British thermal units (MMBTUs) for For the most
recent calendar year for which data are available, the total amount of energy
consumed, the amount of clean and renewable energy consumed, and the
percentage of clean and renewable energy consumed. For the electricity
sector, the report shall also state the amounts in megawatt hours (MWH) of
retail sales and load for Vermont as well as for each retail electricity provider
and the Vermont and New England summer and winter peak electric demand,
including the hour and day of peak demand.
(B) Projections of the energy reductions and shift to clean and
renewable energy expected to occur under existing policies, technologies, and
markets. The most recent available data shall be used to inform these
projections and shall be provided as a supplement to the data described in
subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3).
(C) Recommendations of policies to further the clean and renewable
energy requirements and goals set forth in statute and the Plan, along with an
evaluation of the relative cost-effectiveness and equity-related impacts of
different policy approaches.
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 3 of 24
* * *
(7) The report shall include the following information on progress
toward meeting the Renewable Clean Energy Standard (RES CES):
(A) An assessment of the costs and benefits of the RES CES based
on the most current available data, including rate and economic impacts,
customer savings, technology deployment, greenhouse gas emission reductions
achieved both relative to 10 V.S.A § 578 requirements and societally, fuel
price stability, effect on transmission and distribution upgrade costs, and any
recommended changes based on this assessment.
(i) For the most recent calendar year for which data is available,
each retail electricity provider’s retail sales and total load, in MWh; required
amounts of clean and renewable energy for each category of the RES CES as
set forth in section 8005 of this title; and amounts of clean and renewable
energy and tradeable clean and renewable energy credits eligible to satisfy the
requirements of sections 8004 and 8005 of this title actually owned by the
Vermont retail electricity providers, expressed as a percentage of retail sales
and total load MWh purchases made by Vermont retail electricity providers to
meet demand.
* * *
(iv) The report shall assess how costs and benefits of the RES
CES are being distributed across State, to the extent possible given available
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 4 of 24
data, by retail electricity service territory, municipality, and environmental
justice focus populations, as defined by 3 V.S.A. § 6002. Such an assessment
shall consider metrics to monitor affordability of electric rates.
(B) Projections, looking at least 10 years ahead, of the impacts of the
RES CES on electric utility rates, total energy consumption, fossil fuel
consumption, and greenhouse gas emissions.
(i) The Department shall consider at least three scenarios based on
high, mid-range, and low energy price forecasts.
(ii) The Department shall provide an opportunity for public comment
on the model during its development and make the model and associated
documents available on the Department’s website.
(iii) The Department shall project, for the State, the impact of the RES
in each of the following areas: electric utility rates, total energy consumption,
electric energy consumption, fossil fuel consumption, and greenhouse gas
emissions. The report shall compare the amount or level in each of these areas
with and without the program.
(C) An assessment of whether the requirements of the RES CES have
been met to date, and any recommended changes needed to achieve those
requirements.
(D) A summary of the activities of distributed renewable generation
programs that support the achievement of the RES CES, including:
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 5 of 24
(i) Standard Offer Program under section 8005a of this title,
including the number of plants participating under contract and in service in
the Program, the prices paid by the Program, and the plant capacity and
average annual energy generation of the participating plants. The report shall
present this information as totals for all participating plants and by category of
renewable energy technology. The report also shall identify the number of
applications received, the number of participating plants under contract, and
the number of participating plants actually in service.
* * *
(9) For the report due in 2029, the Commission shall issue a report on
whether it is reasonable to expect that there will be sufficient new regional
renewable resources available for a retail electricity provider with 75,000 or
more customers to meet its requirement under subdivision 8005(a)(4)(B)(i)(IV)
of this title at or below the alternative compliance payment rate for the new
renewable generation category of section 8005 of this title during the year
beginning on January 1, 2032, or during the years beginning on January 1,
2033 or January 1, 2034. The Commission shall not be required to issue this
report in a contested case under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 but shall conduct a
proceeding on the issue with opportunities for participation by the retail
electricity providers, Vermont Public Power Supply Authority, Renewable
Energy Vermont, and other members of the public. Notwithstanding the
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 6 of 24
timeline specified in subdivision (e)(1) of this section, the Commission shall
file this annual report on or before December 15, 2028.
* * *
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 8002 is amended to read:
§ 8002. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “CES” means the Clean Energy Standard established under sections
8004 and 8005 of this title.
(2) “Clean energy” means both renewable energy, as defined in this
section, as well as electricity produced using a technology that does not emit
greenhouse gases as a by-product of energy generation.
(1)(3) “Commission” means the Public Utility Commission under
section 3 of this title.
(2)(4) “Commissioned” or “commissioning” means the first time a plant
is put into operation following initial construction or modernization if the costs
of modernization are at least 50 percent of the costs that would be required to
build a new plant including all buildings and structures technically required for
the new plant’s operation. However, these terms shall not include activities
necessary to establish operational readiness of a plant.
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 7 of 24
(3)(5) “CPI” means the Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers,
designated as “CPI-U,” in the northeast region, as published by the U.S.
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics.
(4)(6) “Customer” means a retail electric consumer.
(5)(7) “Department” means the Department of Public Service under
section 1 of this title, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.
(6)(8) “Energy conversion efficiency” means the effective use of energy
and heat from a combustion process.
(7)(9) “Environmental attributes” means the characteristics of a plant
that enable the energy it produces to qualify as clean or renewable energy and
include any and all benefits of the plant to the environment such as avoided
emissions or other impacts to air, water, or soil that may occur through the
plant’s displacement of a nonclean or nonrenewable energy source.
(8)(10) “Existing renewable energy” means renewable energy produced
by a plant that came into service prior to or on December 31, 2009.
(9)(11) “Greenhouse gas reduction credits” shall be as defined in section
8006a of this title.
(10)(12) “Group net metering system” means a net metering system
serving more than one customer, or a single customer with multiple electric
meters, located within the service area of the same retail electricity provider.
Various buildings owned by municipalities, including water and wastewater
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 8 of 24
districts, fire districts, villages, school districts, and towns, may constitute a
group net metering system. A union or district school facility may be
considered in the same group net metering system with buildings of its
member schools that are located within the service area of the same retail
electricity provider. A system that files a complete application for a certificate
of public good on or after January 1, 2026, shall not qualify for group net
metering, unless the plant will be located on the same parcel, or a parcel
adjacent to, the parcel where the energy is utilized.
(11)(13) “kW” means kilowatt or kilowatts (AC).
(12)(14) “kWh” means kW hour or hours.
(13)(15) “MW” means megawatt or megawatts (AC).
(14)(16) “MWH” means MW hour or hours.
(15)(17) “Net metering” means measuring the difference between the
electricity supplied to a customer and the electricity fed back by the customer’s
net metering system during the customer’s billing period:
* * *
(16)(18) “Net metering system” means a plant for generation of
electricity that:
* * *
(17)(19) “New renewable energy” means renewable energy capable of
delivery in New England and produced by a specific and identifiable plant
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 9 of 24
coming into service on or after January 1, 2010, but excluding energy
generated by a hydroelectric generation plant with a capacity of 200 MW or
greater.
* * *
(18)(20) “Plant” means an independent technical facility that generates
electricity from renewable energy. A group of facilities, such as wind turbines,
shall be considered one plant if the group is part of the same project and uses
common equipment and infrastructure such as roads, control facilities, and
connections to the electric grid. Common ownership, contiguity in time of
construction, and proximity of facilities to each other shall be relevant to
determining whether a group of facilities is part of the same project.
(19)(21) “Plant capacity” means the rated electrical nameplate for a
plant, except that, in the case of a solar energy plant, the term shall mean the
aggregate AC nameplate capacity of all inverters used to convert the plant’s
output to AC power.
(20)(22) “Plant owner” means a person who has the right to sell
electricity generated by a plant.
(21)(23) “Renewable energy” means energy produced using a
technology that relies on a resource that is being consumed at a harvest rate at
or below its natural regeneration rate.
* * *
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 10 of 24
(22)(24)(A) “Renewable pricing” shall mean an optional service
provided or contracted for by an electric company:
* * *
(23)(25) “Retail electricity provider” or “provider” means a company
engaged in the distribution or sale of electricity directly to the public.
(24)(26) “Standard Offer Facilitator” means an entity appointed by the
Commission pursuant to subsection 8005a(a) of this title.
(25) [Repealed.]
(26)(27) “Tradeable renewable energy credits” means all of the
environmental attributes associated with a single unit of energy generated by a
renewable energy source where:
* * *
(28) “Tradeable zero emissions credits” or “ZECs” means all of the
environmental attributes associated with a single unit of energy generated by a
clean energy source where:
(A) those attributes are transferred or recorded separately from that
unit of energy;
(B) the party claiming ownership of the tradeable zero emissions
credits has acquired the exclusive legal ownership of all, and not less than all,
the environmental attributes associated with that unit of energy; and
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 11 of 24
(C) exclusive legal ownership can be verified through an auditable
contract path or pursuant to the system established or authorized by the
Commission or any program for tracking and verification of the ownership of
environmental attributes of energy legally recognized in any state and
approved by the Commission.
(27)(29) “Vermont composite electric utility system” means the
combined generation, transmission, and distribution resources along with the
combined retail load requirements of the Vermont retail electricity providers.
(28)(30) “Energy transformation project” means an undertaking that
provides energy-related goods or services but does not include or consist of the
generation of electricity and that results in a net reduction in fossil fuel
consumption by the customers of a retail electricity provider and in the
emission of greenhouse gases attributable to that consumption. Examples of
energy transformation projects may include home weatherization or other
thermal energy efficiency measures; air source or geothermal heat pumps; high
efficiency heating systems; increased use of biofuels; biomass heating systems;
support for transportation demand management strategies; support for electric
vehicles or related infrastructure; and infrastructure for the storage of
renewable energy on the electric grid.
(29) “RES” means the Renewable Energy Standard established under
sections 8004 and 8005 of this title.
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 12 of 24
(30)(31) “Energy storage facility” has the same meaning as in section
201 of this title.
(31)(32) “Load” means the total amount of electricity utilized by a retail
electricity provider over a 12-month calendar year period, including its retail
electric sales, any use by the provider itself not included in retail sales, and
transmission and distribution line losses associated with and allocated to the
retail electricity provider.
(32)(33) “Load growth” means the increase above a baseline year in a
retail electricity provider’s load.
Sec. 3. 30 V.S.A. § 8004 is amended to read:
§ 8004. SALES OF ELECTRIC ENERGY; RENEWABLE CLEAN
ENERGY STANDARD (RES CES)
(a) Establishment Expansion; requirements. The RES Renewable Energy
Standard is established expanded to become the CES. Under this program, a
retail electricity provider shall not sell or otherwise provide or offer to sell or
provide electricity in the State of Vermont without ownership of sufficient
energy produced by clean and renewable energy plants or sufficient tradeable
renewable energy and zero emissions credits from plants whose energy is
capable of delivery in New England that reflect the required amounts of clean
and renewable energy set forth in section 8005 of this title or without support
of energy transformation projects in accordance with that section. A retail
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 13 of 24
electricity provider may meet the required amounts of clean and renewable
energy through eligible tradeable renewable energy and zero emissions credits
that it owns and retires, eligible clean and renewable energy resources with
environmental attributes still attached, or a combination of those credits and
resources.
(b) Rules. The Commission shall adopt update the rules that are necessary
to allow the Commission and the Department to implement and supervise
further the implementation and maintenance of the RES CES.
(c) RECS RECs and ZECs; banking. The Commission shall allow a
provider that has met the required amount amounts of clean and renewable
energy or zero emissions credits in a given year, commencing with 2017, to
retain tradeable renewable energy or zero emissions credits created or
purchased in excess of that amount for application to the provider’s required
amount of clean or renewable energy in one of the following three years.
(d) Alternative compliance payment. In lieu of purchasing renewable
energy or tradeable renewable energy or zero emissions credits or supporting
energy transformation projects to satisfy the requirements of this section and
section 8005 of this title, a retail electricity provider in this State may pay to
the Vermont Clean Energy Development Fund established under section 8015
of this title an alternative compliance payment at the applicable rate set forth in
section 8005. The administrator of the Vermont Clean Energy Development
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 14 of 24
Fund shall use the payment from a retail electricity provider electing to make
an alternative compliance payment to satisfy its obligations under subdivisions
8005(a)(1), 8005(a)(2), 8005(a)(4), and 8005(a)(5) of this title for the
development of renewable energy plants that are intended to serve and benefit
customers with low income of the retail electricity provider that has made the
payment. Such plants shall be located within the provider’s service territory, if
feasible. In the event that such a payment is insufficient to enable the
development of a renewable energy plant, the administrator may use the
payment for other initiatives allowed under section 8015 of this title that will
benefit customers with low income of the retail electricity provider that has
made the payment. As used in this subsection (d), “customer with low
income” means a person purchasing energy from a retail electricity provider
and with an income that is less than or equal to 80 percent of area median
income, adjusted for family size, as published annually by the U.S. Department
of Housing and Urban Development.
* * *
(f) Joint efforts. Retail electricity providers may engage in joint efforts to
meet one or more categories within the RES CES.
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 15 of 24
Sec. 4. 30 V.S.A. § 8005 is amended to read:
§ 8005. RES CES CATEGORIES
(a) Categories. This section specifies five categories of required resources
to meet the requirements of the RES CES established in section 8004 of this
title: total clean and renewable energy, distributed renewable generation,
energy transformation, new renewable energy, and load growth renewable
energy. In order to support progress toward Vermont’s climate goals and
requirements, a provider may, but shall not be required to, exceed the
statutorily required amounts under this section.
(1) Total clean and renewable energy.
(A) Purpose; establishment. To encourage the economic and
environmental benefits of clean and renewable energy, this subdivision
establishes, for the RES CES, minimum total amounts of clean and renewable
energy within the supply portfolio of each retail electricity provider. To satisfy
this requirement, a provider may use clean energy generated within New
England or renewable energy with environmental attributes attached or any
class of tradeable renewable energy credits generated by any renewable energy
plant whose energy is capable of delivery in New England.
(B) Required amounts.
(i) The amounts of total renewable clean energy required by this
subsection (a) shall be 63 percent of each retail electricity provider’s annual
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 16 of 24
load during the year beginning on January 1, 2025, increasing by at least an
additional four 7.4 percent each third January 1 thereafter until reaching 100
percent: on and after January 1, 2030.
(i) on and after January 1, 2035 for a retail electricity provider who
serves a single customer that takes service at 115 kilovolts and each municipal
retail electricity provider formed under local charter or chapter 79 of this title;
and
(ii) on and after January 1, 2030, for all other retail electricity
providers The amount of total renewable energy required by this subsection (a)
shall be 63 percent of each retail electricity provider’s annual electricity
purchases during the year beginning on January 1, 2025, increasing to 67
percent of each retail electricity provider’s annual electricity purchases during
the year beginning on January 1, 2028, increasing to 71 percent of each retail
electricity provider’s annual electricity purchases during the year beginning on
January 1, 2030, and increasing to 75 percent of each retail electricity
provider’s annual electricity purchases on and after January 1, 2032.
* * *
(2) Distributed renewable generation.
(A) Purpose; establishment. This subdivision establishes a
distributed renewable generation category for the RES CES. This category
encourages the use of distributed generation to support the reliability of the
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 17 of 24
State’s electric system;, reduce line losses;, contribute to avoiding or deferring
improvements to that system necessitated by transmission or distribution
constraints;, and diversify the size and type of resources connected to that
system. This category requires the use of renewable energy for these purposes
to reduce environmental and health impacts from air emissions that would
result from using other forms of generation.
* * *
(3) Energy transformation.
(A) Purpose; establishment. This subdivision (3) establishes an
energy transformation category for the RES CES. This category encourages
Vermont retail electricity providers to support additional distributed renewable
generation or to support other projects to reduce fossil fuel consumed by their
customers and the emission of greenhouse gases attributable to that
consumption. A retail electricity provider may satisfy the energy
transformation requirement through distributed renewable generation in
addition to the generation used to satisfy subdivision (2) of this subsection (a)
or energy transformation projects or a combination of such generation and
projects.
* * *
(4) New renewable energy.
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 18 of 24
(A) Purpose; establishment. This subdivision (4) establishes a new
regional renewable energy category for the RES CES. This category
encourages the use of new renewable generation to support the reliability of
the regional ISO-NE electric system. To satisfy this requirement, a provider
shall use new renewable energy with environmental attributes attached or any
class of tradeable renewable energy credits generated by any renewable energy
plant coming into service after January 1, 2010, whose energy is capable of
delivery in New England.
* * *
(E) On or before December 15, 2026, the Commission shall issue a
report on whether it is reasonable to expect that there will be sufficient new
regional renewable resources available for a retail electricity provider with
75,000 or more customers to meet its requirement under subdivision
(4)(B)(i)(IV) of this subsection (a) at or below the alternative compliance
payment rate for the new renewable generation category of this section during
the year beginning on January 1, 2030, or at any time in the subsequent five
years. The Commission shall not be required to issue this report in a contested
case under 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 but shall conduct a proceeding on the issue
with opportunities for participation by the retail electricity providers, Vermont
Public Power Supply Authority, Renewable Energy Vermont, and other
members of the public. The Commission may use its authority under sections
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 19 of 24
20 and 21 of this title as may be necessary to support technical analysis
necessary to develop this report.
* * *
Sec. 5. 30 V.S.A. § 8006 is amended to read:
§ 8006. TRADEABLE CREDITS; ENVIRONMENTAL ATTRIBUTES;
RECOGNITION, MONITORING, AND DISCLOSURE
(a) The Commission shall establish or adopt a amend and expand its system
of tradeable renewable energy credits for renewable resources that may be
earned by electric generation qualifying for the prior RES to include clean
energy generation. The system shall recognize tradeable renewable energy
credits monitored and traded on the New England Generation Information
System (GIS); shall provide a process for the recognition, approval, and
monitoring of environmental attributes attached to clean and renewable energy
that are eligible to satisfy the requirements of sections 8004 and 8005 of this
title but are not monitored and traded on the GIS; and shall otherwise be
consistent with regional practices.
(b) The Commission shall ensure that all electricity provider and provider-
affiliate disclosures and representations made with regard to a provider’s
portfolio are accurate and reasonably supported by objective data. Further, the
Commission shall ensure that providers disclose the types of generation used
and shall clearly distinguish between energy or tradeable energy credits
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 20 of 24
provided from clean, renewable, and nonrenewable energy sources and
existing and new renewable energy.
Sec. 6. 30 V.S.A. § 8008 is amended to read:
§ 8008. AGREEMENTS; ATTRIBUTE REVENUES; DISPOSITION BY
COMMISSION
(a) As used in this section, “the revenues” means revenues that are from the
sale, through tradeable clean or renewable energy certificates or other means,
of environmental attributes associated with the generation of clean and
renewable energy from a system of generation resources with a total plant
capacity greater than 200 MW and that are received by a Vermont retail
electricity provider on or after May 1, 2012, pursuant to an agreement,
contract, memorandum of understanding, or other transaction in which a
person or entity agrees to transfer such revenues or rights associated with such
attributes to the provider.
* * *
Sec. 7. 10 V.S.A. § 6505 is amended to read:
§ 6505. EXEMPTION
This subchapter does not apply to any temporary storage by Vermont
Yankee Nuclear Power Corporation of spent nuclear fuel elements or other
radioactive waste at its present the site of the former Vermont Yankee Nuclear
Power Station generated at the same site.
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 21 of 24
Sec. 8. 10 V.S.A. § 6522 is amended to read:
§ 6522. PUBLIC UTILITY COMMISSION REVIEW OF PROPOSALS FOR
NEW STORAGE FACILITIES FOR SPENT NUCLEAR FUEL
* * *
(c) In addition, the following limiting conditions shall apply:
(1) Any certificate of public good issued by the Commission shall
permit storage only of spent fuel that is derived from the operation of at the
former Vermont Yankee and not from any other source site.
(2) Any certificate of public good issued by the Commission shall limit
the cumulative total amount of spent fuel stored at Vermont Yankee to the
amount derived from the operation of the facility up to, but not beyond, March
21, 2012, the end of the current operating license. Authorized capacity may
include on-site storage capacity to accommodate full core offload or any order
or requirement of the Nuclear Regulatory Commission with respect to the fuel
derived from these operations. [Repealed.]
* * *
(4) Compliance with the provisions of this subchapter shall constitute
compliance with the provisions of this chapter that require that approval be
obtained from the General Assembly before construction or establishment of a
facility for the deposit or storage of spent nuclear fuel, but only to the extent
specified in this subchapter or authorized under this subchapter. The Public
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 22 of 24
Utility Commission is authorized to hear and issue a certificate of public good
for such a facility under 30 V.S.A. § 248 to the extent specified or authorized
in this subchapter. Other agencies of the State also may receive and act on
applications related to the construction or establishment of such a facility,
provided that any approval for such a facility applies only to the extent
specified or authorized in this subchapter. Storage of spent fuel derived from
the operation of Vermont Yankee after March 21, 2012 shall require the
approval of the General Assembly under this chapter. [Repealed.]
(5) Compliance with the provisions of this subchapter shall not confer
any expectation or entitlement to continued operation of Vermont Yankee
following the expiration of its current operating license on March 21, 2012.
Before the owners of the generation facility may operate the generation facility
beyond that date, they must first obtain a certificate of public good from the
Public Utility Commission under Title 30. [Repealed.]
Sec. 9. REPEAL
30 V.S.A. § 254 (construction or extended operation of a nuclear power
plant; public engagement process) is repealed.
Sec. 10. 30 V.S.A. § 248 is amended to read:
§ 248. NEW GAS AND ELECTRIC PURCHASES, INVESTMENTS, AND
FACILITIES; CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC GOOD
* * *
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 23 of 24
(e)(1) Before a certificate of public good is issued for the construction of a
nuclear energy generating plant within the State, the Public Utility
Commission shall obtain the approval of the General Assembly and the
Assembly’s determination that the construction of the proposed facility will
promote the general welfare. The Public Utility Commission shall advise the
General Assembly of any petition submitted under this section for the
construction of a nuclear energy generating plant within this State, by written
notice delivered to the Speaker of the House of Representatives and to the
President of the Senate. The Department of Public Service shall submit
recommendations relating to the proposed plant and shall make available to the
General Assembly all relevant material. The requirements of this subsection
shall be in addition to the findings set forth in subsection (b) of this section.
(2) No nuclear energy generating plant within this State may be operated
beyond the date permitted in any certificate of public good granted pursuant to
this title, including any certificate in force as of January 1, 2006, unless the
General Assembly approves and determines that the operation will promote the
general welfare, and until the Public Utility Commission issues a certificate of
public good under this section. If the General Assembly has not acted under
this subsection by July 1, 2008, the Commission may commence proceedings
under this section and under 10 V.S.A. chapter 157, relating to the storage of
radioactive material, but may not issue a final order or certificate of public
VT LEG #386172 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.601
2026 Page 24 of 24
good until the General Assembly determines that operation will promote the
general welfare and grants approval for that operation. [Repealed.]
* * *
(m) In any matter with respect to which the Commission considers the
operation of a nuclear energy generating plant beyond the date permitted in
any certificate of public good granted under this title, including any certificate
in effect as of January 1, 2006, the Commission shall evaluate the application
under current assumptions and analyses and not an extension of the cost
benefit assumptions and analyses forming the basis of the previous certificate
of public good for the operation of the facility. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 11. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386172 v.2